browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
SFX 4412 Y 1
SFX 4412 0 linguistic .
SFX 632 Y 1
SFX 632 0 A .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 C .
SFX 4843 Y 1
SFX 4843 0 D .
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 0 lina .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 E .
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 0 F .
SFX 1177 Y 1
SFX 1177 0 G .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 line .
SFX 2670 Y 1
SFX 2670 0 I .
SFX 1868 Y 1
SFX 1868 0 ling .
SFX 4744 Y 1
SFX 4744 0 erica .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 L .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 M .
SFX 2551 Y 1
SFX 2551 0 N .
SFX 1472 Y 1
SFX 1472 0 P .
SFX 4187 Y 1
SFX 4187 0 R .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 S .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 T .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 lins .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 ulada .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 a .
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 0 b .
SFX 235 Y 1
SFX 235 0 c .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 d .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 e .
SFX 1071 Y 1
SFX 1071 0 f .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 g .
SFX 1059 Y 1
SFX 1059 0 h .
SFX 9 Y 1
SFX 9 0 i .
SFX 4465 Y 1
SFX 4465 0 j .
SFX 2179 Y 1
SFX 2179 0 k .
SFX 79 Y 1
SFX 79 0 l .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 m .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 n .
SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 o .
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 0 ulads .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 p .
SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 0 r .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 s .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 t .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 u .
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 0 v .
SFX 1578 Y 1
SFX 1578 0 x .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 y .
SFX 606 Y 1
SFX 606 0 z .
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 0 glian .
SFX 1288 Y 1
SFX 1288 0 glias .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 tivavan .
SFX 3879 Y 1
SFX 3879 0 tivavas .
SFX 1975 Y 1
SFX 1975 0 zzassan .
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 0 zzassas .
SFX 4322 Y 1
SFX 4322 0 ntaria .
SFX 1367 Y 1
SFX 1367 0 iunà .
SFX 838 Y 1
SFX 838 0 chess .
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 0 igls .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 cladas .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 0 ilavan .
SFX 3287 Y 1
SFX 3287 0 ilavas .
SFX 4598 Y 1
SFX 4598 0 iculà .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 antas .
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 0 igna .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 risond .
SFX 2531 Y 1
SFX 2531 0 ppada .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 ppads .
SFX 4295 Y 1
SFX 4295 0 occupà .
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 0 scritta .
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 0 cheva .
SFX 4443 Y 1
SFX 4443 0 legel .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 fon .
SFX 3220 Y 1
SFX 3220 0 mentescha .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 0 list .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 ulain .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 ulais .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 esch .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 lisà .
SFX 2014 Y 1
SFX 2014 0 vian .
SFX 1411 Y 1
SFX 1411 0 vias .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 chentai .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 chentan .
SFX 3487 Y 1
SFX 3487 0 chentar .
SFX 3486 Y 1
SFX 3486 0 chentas .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 liun .
SFX 3485 Y 1
SFX 3485 0 chentass .
SFX 3001 Y 1
SFX 3001 0 tgissan .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 tgissas .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 tescha .
SFX 2178 Y 1
SFX 2178 0 ladra .
SFX 4442 Y 1
SFX 4442 0 legia .
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 0 odia .
SFX 2527 Y 1
SFX 2527 0 ppain .
SFX 2526 Y 1
SFX 2526 0 ppais .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 vida .
SFX 4331 Y 1
SFX 4331 0 ntà .
SFX 616 Y 1
SFX 616 0 sadas .
SFX 3482 Y 1
SFX 3482 0 chentava .
SFX 1949 Y 1
SFX 1949 0 arisesch .
SFX 4535 Y 1
SFX 4535 0 ireschian .
SFX 4534 Y 1
SFX 4534 0 ireschias .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 ulant .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 fun .
SFX 2690 Y 1
SFX 2690 0 fus .
SFX 4865 Y 1
SFX 4865 0 culada .
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 0 mettian .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 mettias .
SFX 4742 Y 1
SFX 4742 0 erina .
SFX 4066 Y 1
SFX 4066 0 scrivessan .
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 0 scrivessas .
SFX 4427 Y 1
SFX 4427 0 linada .
SFX 4425 Y 1
SFX 4425 0 linads .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 alisadas .
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 0 istreschan .
SFX 4493 Y 1
SFX 4493 0 istreschas .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 uai .
SFX 674 Y 1
SFX 674 0 ual .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 uan .
SFX 1425 Y 1
SFX 1425 0 uar .
SFX 2384 Y 1
SFX 2384 0 uas .
SFX 1503 Y 1
SFX 1503 0 ivai .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 ivan .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 ivar .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 ivas .
SFX 3535 Y 1
SFX 3535 0 ccai .
SFX 3532 Y 1
SFX 3532 0 ccar .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 ccas .
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 0 heschan .
SFX 691 Y 1
SFX 691 0 heschas .
SFX 4659 Y 1
SFX 4659 0 glina .
SFX 4140 Y 1
SFX 4140 0 sader .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 uada .
SFX 2036 Y 1
SFX 2036 0 ulara .
SFX 2048 Y 1
SFX 2048 0 uads .
SFX 1635 Y 1
SFX 1635 0 rella .
SFX 3479 Y 1
SFX 3479 0 chentia .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 0 fegl .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 ulass .
SFX 1794 Y 1
SFX 1794 0 uda .
SFX 4525 Y 1
SFX 4525 0 istì .
SFX 3111 Y 1
SFX 3111 0 rabel .
SFX 3899 Y 1
SFX 3899 0 tissan .
SFX 3898 Y 1
SFX 3898 0 tissas .
SFX 1528 Y 1
SFX 1528 0 itsch .
SFX 4423 Y 1
SFX 4423 0 linain .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 linais .
SFX 4238 Y 1
SFX 4238 0 orisond .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ivel .
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 0 iver .
SFX 4740 Y 1
SFX 4740 0 eriur .
SFX 843 Y 1
SFX 843 0 ulava .
SFX 3601 Y 1
SFX 3601 0 aditsch .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 milli .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 tond .
SFX 3756 Y 1
SFX 3756 0 uga .
SFX 2942 Y 1
SFX 2942 0 ugl .
SFX 3755 Y 1
SFX 3755 0 ugn .
SFX 2523 Y 1
SFX 2523 0 ppass .
SFX 2046 Y 1
SFX 2046 0 uain .
SFX 2045 Y 1
SFX 2045 0 uais .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 martgà .
SFX 2878 Y 1
SFX 2878 0 vina .
SFX 3869 Y 1
SFX 3869 0 tiziun .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 tissem .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 tegiavan .
SFX 3952 Y 1
SFX 3952 0 tegiavas .
SFX 115 Y 1
SFX 115 0 isavan .
SFX 114 Y 1
SFX 114 0 isavas .
SFX 4492 Y 1
SFX 4492 0 istreschia .
SFX 3342 Y 1
SFX 3342 0 gliun .
SFX 1793 Y 1
SFX 1793 0 uin .
SFX 1584 Y 1
SFX 1584 0 uir .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 uis .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 heschia .
SFX 626 Y 1
SFX 626 0 essa .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 minà .
SFX 1811 Y 1
SFX 1811 0 tschà .
SFX 2520 Y 1
SFX 2520 0 ppava .
SFX 2409 Y 1
SFX 2409 0 tgeschian .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 uala .
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 0 tgeschias .
SFX 3914 Y 1
SFX 3914 0 tifitgesch .
SFX 1892 Y 1
SFX 1892 0 igliavan .
SFX 3029 Y 1
SFX 3029 0 strescha .
SFX 1891 Y 1
SFX 1891 0 igliavas .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 uals .
SFX 714 Y 1
SFX 714 0 ifitgassan .
SFX 713 Y 1
SFX 713 0 ifitgassas .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 tori .
SFX 1207 Y 1
SFX 1207 0 ula .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 ivla .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 0 uaziun .
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 0 dessan .
SFX 1187 Y 1
SFX 1187 0 dessas .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 ums .
SFX 3636 Y 1
SFX 3636 0 vita .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 una .
SFX 3698 Y 1
SFX 3698 0 und .
SFX 3565 Y 1
SFX 3565 0 arada .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 uns .
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 0 unz .
SFX 4420 Y 1
SFX 4420 0 linass .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 zadas .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 0 logia .
SFX 1866 Y 1
SFX 1866 0 logic .
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 0 clada .
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 0 clads .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 mentadas .
SFX 4229 Y 1
SFX 4229 0 patic .
SFX 4417 Y 1
SFX 4417 0 linava .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 uass .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 ura .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 urn .
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 0 urs .
SFX 4501 Y 1
SFX 4501 0 istrassan .
SFX 4500 Y 1
SFX 4500 0 istrassas .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 idond .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 usa .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 unalisai .
SFX 3724 Y 1
SFX 3724 0 unalisar .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 uta .
SFX 3176 Y 1
SFX 3176 0 ndavan .
SFX 4057 Y 1
SFX 4057 0 segna .
SFX 3175 Y 1
SFX 3175 0 ndavas .
SFX 2875 Y 1
SFX 2875 0 zader .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 uava .
SFX 2389 Y 1
SFX 2389 0 tureschan .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 0 tureschas .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 ientscha .
SFX 3471 Y 1
SFX 3471 0 clain .
SFX 3470 Y 1
SFX 3470 0 clais .
SFX 3166 Y 1
SFX 3166 0 nisada .
SFX 3164 Y 1
SFX 3164 0 nisads .
SFX 3909 Y 1
SFX 3909 0 tifitgeschian .
SFX 3908 Y 1
SFX 3908 0 tifitgeschias .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 gesch .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 0 tisesch .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 crap .
SFX 3466 Y 1
SFX 3466 0 crat .
SFX 2042 Y 1
SFX 2042 0 uassan .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 uassas .
SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 0 nisadas .
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 0 elar .
SFX 4703 Y 1
SFX 4703 0 ettain .
SFX 4701 Y 1
SFX 4701 0 ettais .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 ellada .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 upel .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 ellads .
SFX 1427 Y 1
SFX 1427 0 tschient .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 egiai .
SFX 786 Y 1
SFX 786 0 egian .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 egiar .
SFX 722 Y 1
SFX 722 0 egias .
SFX 4144 Y 1
SFX 4144 0 ruts .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 nisain .
SFX 3161 Y 1
SFX 3161 0 nisais .
SFX 3995 Y 1
SFX 3995 0 statal .
