browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
bursa/1465,2575,3242
des/1,23,27,246,382,837,838,1020,1196,1197,1245,1402,1573,1939,2847,2848,3465,3580,3583,3584,3585,3586,3587,3588,3589,3590,3591,3592,3593,3594
FSS/1472
gie/13,14,16,17,18,19,98,634,1202
IFPD/2085
inc/79,357,707,1059,1140,1141,1142,1143,1144,1145,1146,1147,1148,1149,1150,1151,1152,1369,1661,3259,3389,4401,4991
Juhu/4465
LEG/632
LFT/4843
Mali/1578
mel/99,102,165,301,517,1029,1179,1875,2137,2546,2819,3258,4436
meta/1867,2691,3010,3070,4412,4912
migi/1,2,3,4,5,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,181,308,2029
nativ/326
off/15,30,83,244,522,863,942,996,997,998,999,1041,1256,1751,1770,2707,3391,4414,4729
panoramic/5
peda/69,785,829,898,1017,1132,1206,2034,3130,4278,4322
pens/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,77,141,153,154,265,292,325,641,781,1101,1366,1367,1507,1508,1509,1510,1511,1512,1513,1514,1515,1516,1517,1518,1519,1520,1521,1522,1523,1524,1525,1675,1791,2183
port/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,67,78,153,183,217,310,325,363,736,784,1061,1757,1920,2674,4672,4959
post/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,57,58,59,78,105,146,153,192,217,252,292,339,739,773,805,840,841,842,843,844,845,846,847,848,849,850,851,929,930,931,932,933,934,935,1469,1845,2105,2226,2377,3195,3285,3541,4740
recul/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,3870,3871,3872,3873,3874,3875,3876,3877,3878,3879,3880,3881,3882,3883,3884,3885,3888,3889,3891,3892,3893,3894,3895
represchent/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,80,199,298,331,442,539,604,732,3554
ritmisai/1,2,2090,2361,2362,2447
run/3,4,5,6,7,8,12,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,55,78,80,199,203,217,234,235,327,359,382,393,453,454,455,470,537,538,557,558,559,560,561,562,563,564,565,566,567,571,731,1111,1192,1235,1236,1238,1817,2311,2403,2404,2998,2999,3000,3001,3002,3003,3004,3005,3006,3933,3934,3935
San/84,132,248,310
SAP/1097
sar/9,10,55,465,2311,2766
Sco/56,77,156,180,323,955,1002
sel/13,16,210,381,1071,2593,3440,3441,3442,4802,4803,4805,4806,4807,4808,4809,4810,4811,4812,4813,4814,4815,4816,4817
sex/1,60,88,150,197,1312,2074,2410,4995
sfa/1,2,11,296,359,571,807
SFC/1559
SIA/821,1559
sich/2385
sid/5,326,3122,3579,4744,4869
smaglia/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,606,1970,1971,1972,1973,1974,1975,1976,1977,1978,1979,1980,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,2330,2331,2332,2334
sparta/1411,2698
spazza/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,62,63,2550
sper/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,12,20,22,23,25,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,54,55,56,60,201,331,373,409,425,436,441,698,790,831,902,924,982,1093,1094,1095,1115,1184,1185,1186,1187,1188,1189,1190,1198,1239,1241,1597,1820,1822,3452,3453,3549,3939,3941,4958
SSM/1177
SSO/1181
sta/1,2,9,10,11,12,15,22,24,55,56,61,98,107,200,234,236,249,250,300,324,352,360,423,568,648,789,983,992,1054,1208,1288,1308,1430,1478,1594,1644,1798,1823,1833,1934,2010,2052,2082,2286,2571,2637,2638,2688,2774,3021,3343,3688,3897,3975,4437,4438,4439,4440,4441,4442,4443,4661,4677,4909
stgamiada/1,45,69
stgava/1552,1725,1726,1727,1728,1729,1730,1731,1732,1733,1734,1735,1736,1737,1738,1970,1971,1972,1973,1974,1975,1976,1977,1978,1979,1980,1981,1982,1983,1984,1985,2330,2331,2332,2334
stort/3,10,1373,3301
Tel/79
trac/2179
tri/3,12,24,35,55,78,79,146,183,235,331,436,440,482,573,683,759,927,1020,1041,1271,1458,1636,1849,1854,1867,1868,2420,2536,3231,3332,3605,4695,4908,4965,4995,4996,4997
UCP/1097,1664
UFP/1472,2670
UFPE/4187
UGCP/2551
UPP/1270
ura/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,56,66,155,234,257,421,617,774,1288,1855
ver/1,5,12,13,22,24,55,95,201,242,261,308,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,517,521,535,543,660,685,686,687,688,689,690,708,709,710,711,712,713,714,715,716,717,718,744,745,746,747,820,853,890,1041,1192,1240,1306,1308,1644,1767,1829,1860,1862,2096,2307,2411,2767,2771,3128,4015,4081,4354,4581,4821,4909
video/1,1070,3009
vul/1,4,13,30,31,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,472,482,626,1349,1468,1560,1841,2364,2365,2367,2879,3113,3639,4695
